Washington statutes.
RCW 19.240.080

Abandoned gift certificates.

An issuer is not required to honor a gift certificate presumed abandoned under chapter 63.30 RCW, if reported and delivered to the department of revenue in the dissolution of a business association.

[ 2023 c 258 s 4; 2004 c 168 s 9.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—2023 c 258 ss 2-8, 10, and 11: See note following RCW 19.150.060.